src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    søgn+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: søgn
    søgn+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: søgn
    søgn+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: søgn
    søgn+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: sagnar
    søgn+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: sagnir
    søgn+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: [søgnum, sagnum]
    søgn+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: sagna
    søgn+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: søgnin
    søgn+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: søgnina
    søgn+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: søgnini
    søgn+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: sagnarinnar
    søgn+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: sagnirnar
    søgn+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: [søgnunum, sagnunum]
    søgn+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: sagnanna
